Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6194.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:Beginning January 1, 2027, any rural hospital that is located on a federally recognized Indian reservation shall be eligible for payments for recipients eligible for medical assistance programs under this chapter for services provided by that rural hospital, regardless of the managed care enrollment status of the beneficiary, that are made at 150 percent of the fee-for-service rate for inpatient and outpatient hospital services, when those services are provided by that rural hospital, not including any beds in the psychiatric unit.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. Section 1 of the act expires January 1, 2029.--- END ---